Utah statutes.
58-24b-301.   Authority to practice physical therapy.

A person may not engage in the practice of physical therapy, unless the person is:

(1)  licensed under this chapter and practices within the scope of that license; or

(2)  exempted from the licensing requirements of this chapter under Section 58-24b-304.

